Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 02.25.090.
Action by department.

The department may institute an action in the superior court to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate a violation of this chapter or of airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter or of an order or ruling made in connection with their administration or enforcement, and the court shall give relief, by way of injunction or otherwise as may be proper, in order to fully effectuate the purposes of this chapter and of the regulations adopted and orders and rulings made under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For authorization for use of rural airport property, see 17 AAC 45, art. 2.

Sec. 02.25.100.
Criminal liability for violation.

Each violation of this chapter or of a regulation, order, or ruling adopted or made under this chapter is a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $500 or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or by both.

History.

(§ 6 ch 12 SLA 1951)

Sec. 02.25.110.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“airport” means an area of land or water designed for the landing and taking-off of aircraft and used or to be used as a point of arrival or departure by air;

“airport hazard” means anything that may obstruct or interfere with the navigation or operation of aircraft on or in the vicinity of an airport, including man-made structures of all kinds, trees and other natural growths, lights or beacons, and electrical or electronic devices emitting signals capable of disrupting radio communication;

“airport hazard area” means an area in the vicinity of an airport in which a hazard to the operation of aircraft might be situated, and that may be designated as such by the department;

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

“person” means an individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic, and includes a trustee, receiver, assignee, or similar representative;

“structure” means an object constructed or installed by man, including buildings, towers, smokestacks, and overhead transmission lines;

“tree” means any object of natural growth.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1951)

Sec. 02.25.120.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Airport Zoning Act.

History.

(§ 7 ch 12 SLA 1951)